Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.100

Cooperation between authorities.

Any two or more authorities may join or cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all of the powers conferred hereby for the purpose of financing, planning, undertaking, constructing or operating a housing project or projects located within the area of operation of any one or more of said authorities.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.82.100. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 11; RRS s 6889-11. Formerly RCW 74.24.100.]